Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 16 Motor Vehicle Franchises

Savings clauses. —

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 3, provides: “Licenses issued under [former] W.S.

40-15-101

through 40-15-109 are valid until July 1, 1988 and may be reissued under this act without further investigation. No person shall be prosecuted for any violation of the licensing requirements under W.S.

31-16-101

through

31-16-124

before July 1, 1988.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic §§ 182 to 187; 62B Am. Jur. 2d Private Franchise Contracts § 1 et seq.

Validity, construction and application of statutes or ordinances licensing business of selling motor vehicles, 57 ALR2d 1265.

Applicability to automobile dealers of regulations as to certificate to title and bills of sale, 57 ALR2d 1265.

Validity, construction and application of state statutes regulating dealings between automobile manufacturers, dealers and franchisees, 82 ALR4th 624.

Franchisor's tort liability for injuries allegedly caused by assault or other criminal activity on or near franchise premises 2 ALR5th 369.

§ 31-16-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Coerce” means compelling another to do what he is not otherwise required to do or not to do what he otherwise has a right to do;

“Department” means the department of transportation;

“Designated family member” means:

The spouse, child, grandchild, parent, brother or sister of the owner of a new motor vehicle dealership who, in the case of the owner’s death, is entitled to inherit the ownership interest in the new motor vehicle dealership under the terms of the owner’s will or applicable intestate laws;

A person who has been nominated by the owner of a new motor vehicle dealership as the successor to the dealership in any written instrument filed with the manufacturer; or

In the case of an incapacitated owner of a new motor vehicle dealership, the person who has been appointed by a court as the legal representative of the incapacitated owner’s property.

“Director” means the director of the department;

“Distributor” means a person who has a franchise from a manufacturer of vehicles to distribute vehicles in this state, and who in whole or in part sells or distributes new vehicles to vehicle dealers or who maintains distributor representatives;

“Distributor branch” means a branch office maintained by a distributor for the same purposes for which a factory branch is maintained;

“Distributor representative” means a person engaged as a representative of a distributor or distributor branch for the purpose of making or promoting the sale of its vehicles or for supervising or contacting its dealers or prospective dealers;

“Factory branch” means a branch office maintained by a manufacturer for the sale of vehicles to distributors, for the sale of vehicles to vehicle dealers or for directing or supervising, in whole or in part, its representatives;

“Factory representative” means a person engaged as a representative of a manufacturer or by a factory branch for the purpose of making or promoting a sale of its vehicles, or for supervising or contacting its dealers or prospective dealers;

“Franchise or dealer’s selling agreement”, hereinafter referred to as the “sales and services agreement”, means a contract or agreement between a vehicle dealer and a manufacturer or its distributor or factory branch by which the dealer is authorized to engage in the business of selling any specified make of new vehicles;

“Motor vehicle” means a self-propelled vehicle, excluding a motor home and which:

Is intended for registration and use on the public highways; and

Has at least three (3) wheels.

“New vehicle” means a motor vehicle which is in the possession of a manufacturer or has been sold by a manufacturer for distribution in the United States to the holders of a valid sales and service agreement, franchise or contract granted by the manufacturer for sale of the new motor vehicle and which is in fact new and on which the original motor vehicle title has not been issued from the franchised dealer;

“Manufacturer” means a person engaged in the business of constructing or assembling vehicles which are subject to registration in this state and, except where otherwise provided, “manufacturer” means a distributor, a factory branch, distributor branch or other representative thereof, but excludes any person whose principal business is wholesale and retail financing. The term includes direct sale manufacturers;

“Principal place of business” means:

For dealers selling fewer than twelve (12) vehicles in any twelve (12) consecutive month period, a permanent commercial building located within the state of Wyoming at which the business of a new motor vehicle dealer may be lawfully carried on in accordance with the terms of all applicable building codes, zoning and other land-use regulatory ordinances, and in which building the public may contact the vehicle dealer or his vehicle salesman at all reasonable times, and at which place of business shall be kept and maintained the books, records and files necessary to conduct the business. The business shall be sufficiently identified with an exterior sign permanently affixed to the building or land with letters clearly visible from the highway facing the site and designated to indicate the nature of the business and the telephone number of the business. A dedicated telephone number shall be required for the principal place of business;

For dealers selling twelve (12) or more vehicles in any twelve (12) consecutive month period, a site upon which a permanent building is located containing adequate facilities to carry on the business of a licensed dealer and used to conduct business as a dealer and not primarily used as, or attached directly to, a residence, with space thereon or contiguous thereto adequate to permit the display of at least five (5) vehicles and sufficiently identified with an exterior sign permanently affixed to the building or land with letters clearly visible from the highway facing the site and designated to indicate the nature of the business. The facilities, sign and space for display shall be in compliance with all applicable zoning ordinances prescribed by the municipality or county in which they are located and in which building the public may contact the vehicle dealer or the dealer’s salespersons during the declared business hours, and at which place of business shall be kept and maintained the books, records and files as required by W.S. 31-11-107(a) and (b) necessary to conduct the business. A dedicated telephone number shall be required for the principal place of business with a published phone number listed in the principal place of business;

“Relevant market area” means that marketing area as defined by the sales and service agreement granted by the manufacturer, distributor or wholesaler and held by a new vehicle dealer;

“Used vehicle” means any vehicle other than a new vehicle;

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 24, § 2.

“Vehicle dealer” or “dealer” means any person engaged in the business of selling or exchanging vehicles or who buys and sells, or exchanges retail three (3) or more vehicles or six (6) or more new vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds in any twelve (12) consecutive month period, but does not include any insurance company, finance company, public utility company or person coming into possession of any vehicle as an incident to its regular business who sells that vehicle, or who sells that vehicle under any contractual rights it may have with respect thereto. Vehicle dealers are classified as follows:

A “new vehicle dealer” means a vehicle dealer that deals solely in new vehicles or in new and used vehicles. It also includes a person who in the ordinary course of business is engaged in the business of selling new motor vehicles to consumers or other end users and who holds a valid sales and service agreement, franchise or contract, granted by a manufacturer, distributor or wholesaler for the sale of its motor vehicles;

A “used vehicle dealer” means a vehicle dealer that deals solely in used vehicles;

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 154, § 3.

“Wholesaler” means a person who sells used vehicles to Wyoming vehicle dealers;

“This act” means W.S.

31-16-101

through

31-16-127

;

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 64, § 2.

“Established place of business” means each place actually occupied either continuously or at regular periods by a manufacturer where the manufacturer’s books and records are kept and a large share of the manufacturer’s business is conducted;

“Recreational vehicle” means a vehicle designed primarily as living quarters for recreational, camping, vacation or travel use which has an electrical system which operates above twelve (12) volts and has a plumbing and heating system;

“Retail vehicle sale” means the lease of a vehicle or transfer of title of a vehicle to another person in exchange for value but excludes a transfer for the purpose of resale;

“Vehicle” means as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xxvi);

A “Wyoming based manufacturer” means a person with an established place of business in Wyoming who is engaged in the business of manufacturing, constructing or assembling new and unused vehicles or their major component parts or both and sells new and unused vehicles to dealers, wholesalers, distributors or the general public. The term includes a factory branch office of the manufacturer, or any partnership, firm, association, joint venture, corporation or trust which is controlled by the manufacturer;

“Agent” means a person other than a holder of any vehicle dealer’s license issued by the department who, for salary, commission or compensation of any kind, negotiates in any way for the sale, purchase, order or exchange of vehicles;

“Applicant” means any person, corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership or any other entity that files an application with the department for a vehicle dealer’s license under this act;

“Licensed dealer” means a vehicle dealer that is licensed by the department pursuant to this act as a new vehicle dealer or a used vehicle dealer;

“Salesperson” means an individual who, for salary, commission or compensation of any kind, is employed either directly, indirectly, regularly or occasionally by any new vehicle dealer or any used vehicle dealer to sell, purchase or exchange vehicles;

A “direct sale manufacturer” means a person licensed under W.S. 31-16-104(a)(ix) who is engaged in the business of manufacturing, constructing or assembling new and unused vehicles and who sells and services, at a facility physically located in the state, vehicles of that manufacturer’s line make to the general public. A direct sale manufacturer shall not include an affiliate or wholly owned subsidiary of a manufacturer’s line make that is presently sold or has previously been sold in this state through a new vehicle dealer.

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 64, § 2.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1997, ch. 154, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2; 2005, ch. 159, § 1; 2007, ch. 80, § 2; 2017 ch. 208, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 64, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “twelve (12) vehicles in any twelve (12) consecutive month period” for “twenty-five (25) vehicles per calendar year” in (a)(xiv)(A) and (a)(xiv)(B); added the final two sentences in (a)(xiv)(A); inserted “landline” in the final sentence in (a)(xiv)(B); and in (a)(xviii), substituted “twelve (12) consecutive month period” for “one (1) calendar year.”

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(xx) substituted “31-16-127” for “31-16-126.”

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(xiii) added the last sentence; and added (a)(xxxi).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(xiv)(A) and (a)(xiv)(B) substituted “A dedicated telephone number” for “A landline telephone” and “required for” for “required in”; in (a)(xiv)(A) substituted “the telephone number” for “the landline telephone number”; and in (a)(xiv)(B) substituted “listed in” for “listed to.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, repealed (a)(xxi), which read, "'Antique vehicle' means a motor vehicle which is at least twenty-five (25) years old"; and repealed (b), which read, "Notwithstanding paragraph (a)(xxv) of this section, for purposes of W.S.

31-16-108

through

31-16-124

“vehicle” means a motor vehicle as defined in paragraph (a)(xi) of this section."

§ 31-16-102.
Unlicensed vehicle dealers and manufacturers prohibited.

No person shall hold himself out as being in the business of a retail seller of vehicles, or act as a retail vehicle dealer, direct sale manufacturer or Wyoming based manufacturer without a valid license issued by the department under this act. No person shall act as a vehicle dealer of a new vehicle without a valid license as a new vehicle dealer for new vehicles of the same line make issued by the department under this act. No person other than a licensed vehicle dealer shall display a vehicle for sale unless the title is in the name of the displayer. No person shall solicit sales of vehicles without a vehicle dealer’s license, unless the title is in the name of the person soliciting sales.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 1; 1997, ch. 154, § 2; 2017 ch. 208, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added “direct sale manufacturer” in the first sentence and made a related change.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first two sentences, see § 31-16-101(a)(xx).

Cited

in

Lariat Diesel Corp. v. Wyo. DOT, 2004 WY 25, 86 P.3d 266,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(2004).

§ 31-16-103.
Licenses; applications; issuance, suspension and revocation; change in ownership; rulemaking.

An applicant for a license required under this act shall, before commencing business and annually thereafter submit an application to the department in a form prescribed by the department containing the following:

The legal name and residence address of the applicant and the trade name, if any, under which the applicant intends to conduct his business. If the applicant is a partnership, the name and residence address of each partner, whether a limited or general partner, and the name under which the partnership business is to be conducted. If the applicant is a corporation, the name of the corporation and the name and address of each of its principal officers and directors. If the applicant is a limited liability company, the name and address of the members and managers;

A complete description, including the address, of the principal place of business and any other place of business for activities requiring a license under this act operated and maintained by the applicant in conjunction with the principal place of business in each county in this state;

For a new vehicle dealer’s license, copies of letters of franchise for the new vehicles that the applicant has been enfranchised to sell or exchange and the name and addresses of any manufacturer or distributor who has enfranchised the applicant;

For a manufacturer’s license, the name and address of each distributor, factory branch and factory representative;

Any other information the department may reasonably require, including financial statements of new applicants, past or present judicial, civil or administrative dispositions of criminal, civil or administrative actions relating to the conduct of the business if currently licensed or a new applicant, telephone numbers, sales and use tax numbers for the business and declared business hours. Any new applicant for a license issued under this act, including all officers of a corporation or members of a limited liability company or limited partnership, shall provide information necessary for a state and national criminal history record background check and release of information as provided in W.S. 7-19-106(k)(ii) and consent to the release of any criminal history information to the department;

If a renewal of dealer’s license, the number of retail vehicle sales each month during the twelve (12) full calendar months preceding the month in which the renewal application is made;

For a Wyoming based manufacturer’s license, a description of the location of each established place of business in this state, the number of manufacturer license plates requested, a statement of the need for the plates including, but not limited to, the number of employees, annual sales, and such other information as required by the department;

For a direct sale manufacturer’s license, a description of the location of each established place of business in this state, the number of manufacturer license plates requested, a statement of the need for the plates including, but not limited to, the number of employees, annual sales, and such other information as required by the department.

Pending determination by the department that the applicant has met the requirements under this act, it may issue a temporary license to any applicant. A temporary license shall not exceed a period of ninety (90) days while the department is completing its investigation and determination of all facts relative to the qualifications of the applicant for the license. The temporary license terminates when the applicant’s license has been issued or refused. When the department determines the applicant has complied with all licensing requirements, the department shall issue a license or renewal to an applicant upon submission of a complete application to the department indicating the applicant is qualified and will operate from a principal place of business if a dealer or a direct sale manufacturer or from an established place of business if a Wyoming based manufacturer, and upon filing of a bond and payment of a license fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for dealers selling fewer than twelve (12) vehicles in any twelve (12) consecutive month period and one hundred dollars ($100.00) for dealers selling twelve (12) or more vehicles in any twelve (12) consecutive month period as follows:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 154, § 3.

Any additional place of business to be licensed under this act has sufficient facilities such that it could qualify as a principal place of business and is located in the same county in which the principal place of business is located;

To a dealer who had at least twelve (12) retail sales or exchanged at least twelve (12) vehicles or six (6) or more new vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds in the twelve (12) full calendar months preceding the date of application;

To a dealer selling self-propelled motor homes or drilling and service rigs;

To a person who did not hold a certificate at the time of the application;

To a person engaged in the business of repossessing vehicles if that person repossessed at least twelve (12) vehicles in the twelve (12) full calendar months preceding the date of application, but the person need not have a principal place of business as defined in this act;

To a banking or lending institution engaged in the business of making loans secured by vehicles;

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 64, § 2.

To the applicant who has not had a license issued under this chapter suspended or revoked without reinstatement, and has not violated the provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation adopted under this chapter, if the applicant is:

A partner in a partnership;

A director or stockholder of a corporation duly registered and doing business in Wyoming; or

A member or manager of a limited liability company duly registered and doing business in Wyoming.

To any additional place of business that may qualify under this act.

The department may deny, suspend, revoke or refuse to renew a license or temporary permit issued under this act if it finds the person, applicant, vehicle dealer, salesperson, agent, direct sale manufacturer or Wyoming based manufacturer:

Knowingly violated any rule, regulation or statute or any federal law regulating dealers and manufacturers, or any federal vehicle safety standards applicable to dealers or Wyoming based manufacturers;

Knowingly made a materially false statement in applying for a license, demo plates, full use plates, temporary registration permits, or dealer reassignment documents used by the applicant;

Failed to furnish or keep in force the required bond;

Has any previous administrative or criminal actions or has lost a civil action in this state or any other state relating to the conduct of the business license or applied for during the ten (10) years preceding the date of the application;

Used or permitted the use of demo or full use plates in an unauthorized manner or for an unauthorized purpose;

Used or permitted the use of temporary registration permits in an unauthorized manner or for an unauthorized purpose;

Has been convicted of a felony involving fraud, conspiracy to commit fraud, forgery, embezzlement, obtaining money under false pretenses, larceny, theft or extortion within the immediate ten (10) year period prior to the date of license application;

Has been convicted of a felony under W.S.

6-2-302

;

Failed to furnish any requested information to the department.

If a new vehicle dealer changes to, or adds, another franchise for the sale of new vehicles, cancels or otherwise loses a franchise for the sale of new vehicles, the dealer shall immediately notify the department. If there is a cancellation or loss of franchise, and the department determines the dealer may be licensed as a used vehicle dealer, the vehicle dealer shall surrender the new vehicle dealer’s license and a used vehicle dealer’s license shall be issued. The dealer may continue in the business for which a vehicle dealer is relicensed to dispose of the stock of new vehicles which the dealer had on hand at the time of the relicensing.

The dealer or manufacturer shall immediately notify the department which shall issue a new dealer or Wyoming based manufacturer license for the unexpired portion of the original license at no charge if the dealer changes the site or location of his principal place of business, or the Wyoming based manufacturer changes the site or location of his established place of business.

Sixty (60) days after transfer of ownership of a dealership or the business of a Wyoming based manufacturer or direct sale manufacturer, except as a result of transfer of shares of stock in a corporate dealership or Wyoming based manufacturer duly incorporated in Wyoming, the dealer license, Wyoming based manufacturer license, demo plates, full use plates, manufacturer plates and temporary permits are void and shall immediately be delivered to the department. The new owner shall apply for a new dealer license, demo plates, full use plates, manufacturer plates and temporary permits immediately upon transfer of ownership. Upon transfer of ownership or termination of business the former dealer, direct sale manufacturer or Wyoming based manufacturer shall notify the department and, if not a transfer of ownership, immediately deliver the dealer license, direct sale manufacturer license, Wyoming based manufacturer license, demo plates, full use plates, manufacturer plates and temporary permits to the department.

A Wyoming licensed dealer may establish and operate an additional place of business or operate in an organized motor vehicle show as a vehicle dealer if:

Each additional place of business except those located in an enclosed shopping mall, shall meet the same criteria as set forth in W.S. 31-16-101(a)(xiv);

Before operating in an organized motor vehicle show, a licensed dealer shall notify the department in writing not later than fourteen (14) days prior to the date of the show and obtain a letter of authorization from the department to operate in an organized motor vehicle show within the county of the principal place of business, or within the dealer’s relevant market area as defined by W.S. 31-16-101(a)(xv). A vehicle dealer may operate in not more than four (4) shows in any calendar year and each show shall not exceed seven (7) consecutive days. The letter of authorization to operate in an organized motor vehicle show shall be displayed in a location at the motor vehicle show where any peace officer or designated member of the department can examine it. As used in this subsection, “organized motor vehicle show” means an exhibition and sale by one (1) or more licensed motor vehicle dealers in a private or public assembly, facility or area.

An applicant for a license to operate as a dealer or Wyoming based manufacturer shall also file with the department a bond in the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) with a corporate surety duly licensed to do business within this state. The bond shall:

Be approved as to form by the attorney general;

Guarantee the return of the dealer or Wyoming based manufacturer license, manufacturer plates, full use and demo plates, and temporary permits; and

Be conditioned that the applicant shall not practice any fraud, fraudulent misrepresentations, or violate any federal or state law, rules or regulations relating to the conduct of the business.

The department shall promulgate rules necessary to implement and enforce this act, including rules relating to the authorized use of demo, full use or manufacturer plates, the form of the plates and the number of manufacturer plates issued.

If the director has reasonable cause to believe that a licensee or other person has violated or is violating any provision of this act or any other law related to the conduct of a vehicle dealer or has violated or is violating any rule or order adopted or issued by the department pursuant to law, in addition to any other remedies existing in this act, the director may bring and maintain, in the name and on behalf of the department, an action in the proper court against a licensee or other person to restrain or enjoin the licensee or other person from continuing the violation. In the action, the court shall proceed as in other actions for injunction.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 1; 1997, ch. 154, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 24, § 1; 2005, ch. 159, § 1; 2007, ch. 80, § 2; 2013 ch. 191, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 208, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 64, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted the final sentence in (a)(v); in (b) added the provisions pertaining to issuance of a temporary license pending determination that the applicant has met the requirements and twice substituted “in any twelve (12) consecutive month period” for “per calendar year”; added (c)(vii) through (c)(ix); in (g)(ii), added “or within the dealer's relevant market area as defined by W.S. 31-16-101(a)(xv)” at the end of the first sentence; in (h), increased the amount of the bond from $10,000 to $25,000; and added (k).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (c) inserted “or temporary permit” following “renew a license.”

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “theft” to the string of felonies listed in (c)(vii).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added (a)(viii); in (b) added “or a direct sale manufacturer” following “if a dealer” in the middle of the second sentence; in (c) added “direct sale manufacturer” preceding “or Wyoming based;” in (f) in the first sentence added “or direct sale manufacturer,” in the last sentence “direct sale manufacturer” and “direct sale manufacturer license.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, repealed (b)(ix), which read, "To a person selling antique vehicles and paying the annual license fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00)."

Editor's notes. —

Paragraph (b)(iii) of this section was inadvertently repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 154, § 3, effective January 1, 1998. Section 3 of ch. 154 was subsequently amended by Laws 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 3, also effective January 1, 1998, to remove the language repealing paragraph (b)(iii).

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 31-16-101(a)(xx).

License revocation affirmed. —

Court affirmed the reversal of the revocation of an automobile dealer's license because the agency's findings were not sufficient to permit adequate appellate review. State ex rel. DOT v. Legarda, 2003 WY 130, 77 P.3d 708,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 2003).

Cited

in

Lariat Diesel Corp. v. Wyo. DOT, 2004 WY 25, 86 P.3d 266,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(2004).

§ 31-16-104.
Classes of licenses and permits; expiration.

Licenses issued under this act shall be the following classes:

New vehicle dealer’s license which permits the licensee to engage in the business of selling or exchanging new vehicles or both new and used vehicles;

Motor vehicle manufacturer’s license which permits the out-of-state manufacturer to engage in the business of constructing or assembling motor vehicles of the type subject to registration in this state;

and (iv) Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 154, § 3.

Wyoming based manufacturer’s license which permits the licensee to engage in the manufacturing, constructing or assembling of new and unused vehicles or their major component parts or both in the state of Wyoming and sell new and unused vehicles;

Used vehicle dealer’s license which permits the licensee to engage in the business of selling or exchanging used vehicles;

Temporary ninety (90) day vehicle dealer permit allows an applicant to operate a business under this act for a period of ninety (90) days while the department is completing an investigation for any purpose relative to the business. The temporary permit terminates when the applicant’s license has been issued or refused but in no case shall the temporary permit exceed ninety (90) days;

Temporary recreational vehicle display and sales permit pursuant to W.S.

31-16-127

;

Direct sale manufacturer’s license which permits the licensee to sell new and unused vehicles or new and used vehicles of the same line make to the general public. A direct sale manufacturer’s license shall be granted only to a person who seeks to sell or exchange vehicles of that manufacturer’s line make that no other new vehicle dealer in the state sells or exchanges.

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 159, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 154, § 3.

Except for temporary vehicle dealer permits and special recreational vehicle display and sales permits, licenses issued under this act shall be valid for one (1) year and shall expire at midnight preceding the anniversary date.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 1; 1997, ch. 154, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 24, § 1; 2005, ch. 159, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 80, § 2; 2017 ch. 208, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (a)(vii); and repealed former (b), which related to temporary permits (now see paragraph (a)(vii) of this section and also § 31-16-103(b)).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (a)(viii); and inserted the proviso in (d).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added (a)(ix).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 31-16-101(a)(xx).

§ 31-16-105.
Display, form and custody of dealer's license.

The department shall prescribe each form of the license. Each dealer shall conspicuously display his own license in his place of business.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 1.

§ 31-16-106.
Required principal place of business.

The department shall not issue a dealer’s license to any applicant without a principal place of business. If the dealer changes the site or location of his principal place of business, he shall immediately notify the department. A new license shall be granted if the new location meets all the requirements of a principal place of business. If a dealer ceases to have a principal place of business he shall immediately surrender his license to the department until the dealer obtains a principal place of business. The dealer’s license shall be reissued without charge if a principal place of business is established. Nothing in this act shall be construed to prevent a dealer from conducting the business for which he is licensed at one (1) or more licensed supplemental lots or locations not contiguous but operated and maintained in conjunction with the dealer’s principal place of business.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the last sentence, see § 31-16-101(a)(xx).

§ 31-16-107.
Right of action.

Any person injured because he refuses to agree to a proposal which would be in violation of this act, may bring an action for damages and equitable relief, including injunctive relief.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-16-101(a)(xx).